Missouri, session 2026, HB2235.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 443, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 443.1060, to read as follows:
443.1060. A person shall not obtain a loan with a quitclaim deed unless the
2 person is a party to the original warranty deed or obtained title to the real property
3 through a quiet title action.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.